Vermont statutes. Title 19 Highways
Article 2. Indictment for Failure to Make Repairs

§ 991.
Fine.

When a town, liable to keep in repair a highway or bridge, fails to do so, it may be indicted for this neglect by a grand jury of the county, and may be fined at the discretion of the court, whether any special damage has been sustained or not. The fine so assessed shall be spent in repairing the highway or bridge, under the direction of a commissioner appointed by the court.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 992.
Notice before indictment.

A town shall not be indicted for not keeping in repair its highways and bridges unless a notice describing the highway or bridge complained of and describing in general terms its defects, signed by some person residing in the State, is delivered to one of the selectmen at least 12 days before the return date of the complaint to the court to which the complaint is made.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 993.
Joint liability.

When towns, jointly liable, fail to keep a bridge in repair, they may be indicted by the grand jury of any county in which either of the towns is situated and may be fined at the discretion of the court.
The fine and costs shall be paid by the several towns in the proportion in which they were assessed for the building of the bridge.
In making the apportionment, the court may take into consideration what has already been paid by any town and issue execution against each for its proportion.
The fine shall be spent in repairing the bridge under the direction of a commissioner appointed by the court.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 994.
Notice of indictment; collection of fine.

When an indictment is presented to the Superior Court, as provided in this subchapter, the clerk shall issue a citation to the town indicted, and it shall be served as writs are by law required to be served against towns, at least 12 days before the date of trial.
The execution issued for the fine and costs shall be levied and collected like executions in civil causes against towns.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 995.
Description of highway.

It shall not be necessary to state in the indictments the exact length or width of the highway, but it shall be sufficient to describe it as a highway leading from some particular place to some other particular place.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 996.
Highway construction, maintenance, and repair best management practices.

The Agency of Transportation shall work with municipal representatives to revise the Agency of Transportation’s Town Road and Bridge Standards in order to incorporate a suite of practical and cost-effective best management practices, as approved by the Agency of Natural Resources, for the construction, maintenance, and repair of all existing and future State and town highways. These best management practices shall address activities that have a potential for causing pollutants to enter the groundwater and waters of the State, including stormwater runoff and direct discharges to State waters. The best management practices shall not supersede any requirements for stormwater management already set forth in

10 V.S.A. §§ 1264

and 1264a that apply to State and town highways. The Agency of Transportation shall report to the House and Senate Committees on Transportation, the house committee on fish, wildlife and water resources, and the Senate Committee on Natural Resources and Energy by January 15, 2011, on the best management practices to be incorporated into the Agency of Transportation’s Town Road and Bridge Standards.

Beginning January 15, 2013, and every four years thereafter, the Secretary in consultation with municipal representatives and with approval from the Agency of Natural Resources shall review and revise, as appropriate, Town Road and Bridge Standards in order to ensure the standards are protective of water quality.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 110

(Adj. Sess.), § 17, eff. May 18, 2010.